Utah statutes.
76-10-1303.   Patronizing a prostitute.

(1)  A person is guilty of patronizing a prostitute when the person:

(a) pays or offers or agrees to pay another person a fee for the purpose of engaging in an act of sexual activity; or

(b) enters or remains in a house of prostitution for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity.

(2)  Patronizing a prostitute is a class B misdemeanor, except as provided in Subsection (3) or (4) and in Section 76-10-1309.

(3)  A violation of this section that is preceded by a conviction under this section or a conviction under local ordinance adopted under Section 76-10-1307 is a class A misdemeanor.

(4)  If the patronizing of a prostitute under Subsection (1)(a) involves a child as the other person, a violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a third degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 30, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 196, 2013 General Session

